Utah statutes.
75-5-101.   Jurisdiction of subject matter -- Consolidation of proceedings.
(1) The court has jurisdiction over protective proceedings and guardianship
proceedings.
(2)  When both guardianship and protective proceedings as to the same person
are commenced or pending in the same court, the proceedings may be
consolidated.
